Illinois, session 104th, HB5594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 3-752 and 63-753 as follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/3-752)8    Sec. 3-752. Certificate.9    (a) The petition may be accompanied by the certificate of 10a physician, qualified examiner, psychiatrist, advanced 11practice psychiatric nurse, nurse practitioner, or clinical 12psychologist which certifies that the respondent is subject to 13involuntary admission on an outpatient basis. The certificate 14shall indicate that the physician, qualified examiner, 15psychiatrist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, nurse 16practitioner, or clinical psychologist personally examined the 17respondent not more than 72 hours prior to the completion of 18the certificate. It shall also contain the physician's, 19qualified examiner's, psychiatrist's, advanced practice 20psychiatric nurse's, nurse practitioner's, or clinical 21psychologist's clinical observations, other factual 22information relied upon in reaching a diagnosis, and a 23statement as to whether the respondent was advised of his or   HB5594- 2 -LRB104 19572 KTG 33020 b1her rights under Section 3-208. 2    (b) Upon receipt of the petition either with or without a 3certificate, if the court finds the documents are in order, it 4may make such orders pursuant to Section 3-753 as are 5necessary to provide for examination of the respondent. If the 6petition is not accompanied by a certificate 2 certificates 7executed pursuant to Section 3-753, the court may order the 8respondent to present himself or herself for examination at a 9time and place designated by the court. If the petition is 10accompanied by a certificate 2 certificates executed pursuant 11to Section 3-753 and the court finds the documents are in 12order, the court shall set the matter for hearing. 13(Source: P.A. 101-587, eff. 1-1-20.) 14    (405 ILCS 5/3-753)15    Sec. 3-753. Examination. If no certificate was filed, the 16respondent shall be examined separately by a physician, 17clinical psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, 18nurse practitioner, or qualified examiner and by a 19psychiatrist. If a certificate executed by a psychiatrist was 20filed, the respondent shall be examined by a physician, 21clinical psychologist, qualified examiner, advanced practice 22psychiatric nurse, nurse practitioner, or psychiatrist. If a 23certificate executed by a qualified examiner, clinical 24psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, nurse 25practitioner, or a physician who is not a psychiatrist was   HB5594- 3 -LRB104 19572 KTG 33020 b1filed, the respondent shall be examined by a psychiatrist. The 2examining physician, clinical psychologist, qualified 3examiner, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, nurse 4practitioner, or psychiatrist may interview by telephone or in 5person any witnesses or other persons listed in the petition 6for involuntary admission. If, as a result of an examination, 7a certificate is executed, the certificate shall be promptly 8filed with the court. If a certificate is executed, the 9examining physician, clinical psychologist, qualified 10examiner, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, nurse 11practitioner, or psychiatrist may also submit for filing with 12the court a report in which his or her findings are described 13in detail, and may rely upon such findings for his opinion that 14the respondent is subject to involuntary admission. Copies of 15the certificates shall be made available to the attorneys for 16the parties upon request prior to the hearing. 17(Source: P.A. 101-587, eff. 1-1-20.)